Maine, session 132, LD2080.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 8 MRSA §1203, sub-§2, ¶C, as enacted by PL 2021, c. 681, Pt. J, §6, is
amended to read:
C. The methods of operation of sports wagering, including but not limited to the
permitted systems and methods of wagers; the use of credit and checks by persons
making wagers, which must prohibit a person from making a wager using a credit card;
the types of wagering receipts that may be used; the method of issuing receipts; the
prevention of sports wagering on prohibited sports events; the protection of patrons
placing wagers; and the promotion of social responsibility and responsible gaming and
display of information on resources for problem gambling at a facility operator's
premises or on any mobile application or digital platform used to place wagers;
Sec. 2. 8 MRSA §1203, sub-§2, ¶F, as enacted by PL 2021, c. 681, Pt. J, §6, is
amended to read:
F. Minimum design and security requirements for the physical premises of facility
operators in which sports wagering is conducted, including but not limited to minimum
requirements for the acceptance of wagers at a self-serve kiosk located on the premises
and minimum required methods for verifying the identity and age of a person who
places a wager with a facility operator, for verifying that the person making a wager is
not prohibited from making a wager under section 1213, for ensuring that a person does
not use a credit card to make a wager and for requiring the refund of any wager
determined to have been placed by a person prohibited from making a wager under
section 1213;
Sec. 3. 8 MRSA §1203, sub-§2, ¶G, as enacted by PL 2021, c. 681, Pt. J, §6, is
amended to read:
G. Minimum design and security requirements for mobile applications and digital
platforms for the acceptance of wagers by mobile operators, including required
methods for verifying the age and identity of a person who places a wager with a mobile
Page 1 - 132LR2768(03)

operator, for verifying that the person making the wager is physically located in the
State and is not prohibited from making a wager under section 1213, for ensuring that
a person does not use a credit card to make a wager and for requiring the refund of any
wager determined to have been placed by a person prohibited from making a wager
under section 1213;
Sec. 4. 8 MRSA §1214-A is enacted to read:
§1214-A. Credit cards prohibited
An operator and a management services licensee under section 1209 conducting sports
wagering on behalf of an operator may not accept a wager on a sports event from a person
using a credit card.
Sec. 5. 8 MRSA §1403, sub-§2, ¶A, as enacted by PL 2025, c. 538, §4, is amended
to read:
A. The methods of operation of Internet gaming, including but not limited to the
permitted systems and methods of wagers; the use of credit and checks by persons
making wagers, which must prohibit a person from making a wager using a credit card;
the types of wagering receipts that may be used; the method of issuing receipts; the
protection of patrons placing wagers; and the promotion of social responsibility and
responsible gaming and display of information on resources for problem gambling;
Sec. 6. 8 MRSA §1403, sub-§2, ¶C, as enacted by PL 2025, c. 538, §4, is amended
to read:
C. Minimum design and security requirements for applications and digital platforms
for the acceptance of wagers by operators, including required methods for verifying
the age and identity of a person who places a wager with an operator, for verifying that
the person making the wager is physically located in the State and is not prohibited
from making a wager under section 1412, for ensuring that a person does not use a
credit card to make a wager and for requiring the refund of any wager determined to
have been placed by a person prohibited from making a wager under section 1412;
Sec. 7. 8 MRSA §1412-A is enacted to read:
§1412-A. Credit cards prohibited
An operator and a management services licensee under section 1408 conducting
Internet gaming on behalf of an operator may not accept a wager from a person using a
credit card.
Page 2 - 132LR2768(03)